ru_RU.aff
SET KOI8-R
SFX L Y 57
SFX L   ть    л           [^зс]ть
SFX L   ть    ла          [^с]ть
SFX L   ть    ло          [^с]ть
SFX L   ть    ли          [^с]ть
SFX L   ться  лся         [^зс]ться
SFX L   ться  лась        [^с]ться
SFX L   ться  лось        [^с]ться
SFX L   ться  лись        [^с]ться
SFX L   сть   л           [^ч].сть
SFX L   есть  ёл          честь
SFX L   сть   ла          [^ч].сть
SFX L   есть  ла          честь
SFX L   сть   ло          [^ч].сть
SFX L   есть  ло          честь
SFX L   сть   ли          [^ч].сть
SFX L   есть  ли          честь
SFX L   сться лся         сться
SFX L   сться лась        сться
SFX L   сться лось        сться
SFX L   сться лись        сться
SFX L   сти   л           [^е]сти
SFX L   ести  ёл          ести
SFX L   сти   ла          сти
SFX L   сти   ло          сти
SFX L   сти   ли          сти
SFX L   стись лся         [^е]стись
SFX L   естись ёлся        естись
SFX L   стись лась        стись
SFX L   стись лось        стись
SFX L   стись лись        стись
SFX L   езти  ёз          езти
SFX L   лзти  лз          лзти
SFX L   ти    ла          зти
SFX L   ти    ли          зти
SFX L   ти    ло          зти
SFX L   зть   з           зть
SFX L   ться  ся          зться
SFX L   ечь   ёк          ечь
SFX L   чь    к           [^е]чь
SFX L   чь    кла         чь
SFX L   чь    кло         чь
SFX L   чь    кли         чь
SFX L   ечься ёкся        ечься
SFX L   чься  кся         [^е]чься
SFX L   чься  клась       чься
SFX L   чься  клось       чься
SFX L   чься  клись       чься
SFX L   0     ла          [^аиья]
SFX L   0     ло          [^аиья]
SFX L   0     ли          [^аиья]
SFX L   ся    лась        [^аиья]ся
SFX L   ся    лось        [^аиья]ся
SFX L   ся    лись        [^аиья]ся
SFX L   а     о           а
SFX L   а     и           а
SFX L   ась   ось         ась
SFX L   ась   ись         ась

SFX M Y 84
SFX M   ть    ю           [ае]ть
SFX M   ться  юсь         [ае]ться
SFX M   ть    ем          [ае]ть
SFX M   ться  емся        [ае]ться
SFX M   ть    ешь         [ае]ть
SFX M   ться  ешься       [ае]ться
SFX M   ть    ете         [ае]ть
SFX M   ться  етесь       [ае]ться
SFX M   ть    ет          [ае]ть
SFX M   ться  ется        [ае]ться
SFX M   ть    ют          [ае]ть
SFX M   ться  ются        [ае]ться
SFX M   уть   у           уть
SFX M   ться  сь          уться
SFX M   уть   ем          уть
SFX M   уться емся        уться
SFX M   уть   ешь         уть
SFX M   уться ешься       уться
SFX M   уть   ете         уть
SFX M   уться етесь       уться
SFX M   уть   ет          уть
SFX M   уться ется        уться
SFX M   ть    т           уть
SFX M   ься   ся          уться
SFX M   оть   ю           оть
SFX M   оться юсь         оться
SFX M   оть   ем          оть
SFX M   оться емся        оться
SFX M   оть   ешь         оть
SFX M   оться ешься       оться
SFX M   оть   ете         оть
SFX M   оться етесь       оться
SFX M   оть   ет          оть
SFX M   оться ется        оться
SFX M   оть   ют          оть
SFX M   оться ются        оться
SFX M   ыть   ою          ыть
SFX M   ыться оюсь        ыться
SFX M   ыть   оем         ыть
SFX M   ыться оемся       ыться
SFX M   ыть   оешь        ыть
SFX M   ыться оешься      ыться
SFX M   ыть   оете        ыть
SFX M   ыться оетесь      ыться
SFX M   ыть   оет         ыть
SFX M   ыться оется       ыться
SFX M   ыть   оют         ыть
SFX M   ыться оются       ыться
SFX M   ти    у           [зс]ти
SFX M   тись  усь         [зс]тись
SFX M   ти    ём          [зс]ти
SFX M   тись  ёмся        [зс]тись
SFX M   ти    ёшь         [зс]ти
SFX M   тись  ёшься       [зс]тись
SFX M   ти    ёте         [зс]ти
SFX M   тись  ётесь       [зс]тись
SFX M   ти    ёт          [зс]ти
SFX M   тись  ётся        [зс]тись
SFX M   ти    ут          [зс]ти
SFX M   тись  утся        [зс]тись
SFX M   ти    ду          йти
SFX M   тись  дусь        йтись
SFX M   ти    дём         йти
SFX M   тись  дёмся       йтись
SFX M   ти    дёшь        йти
SFX M   тись  дёшься      йтись
SFX M   ти    дёте        йти
SFX M   тись  дётесь      йтись
SFX M   ти    дёт         йти
SFX M   тись  дётся       йтись
SFX M   ти    дут         йти
SFX M   тись  дутся       йтись
SFX M   чь    ку          чь
SFX M   чься  кусь        чься
SFX M   ь     ём          чь
SFX M   ься   ёмся        чься
SFX M   ь     ёшь         чь
SFX M   ься   ёшься       чься
SFX M   ь     ёте         чь
SFX M   ься   ётесь       чься
SFX M   ь     ёт          чь
SFX M   ься   ётся        чься
SFX M   чь    кут         чь
SFX M   чься  кутся       чься
