ru_RU.dic
акцептовать/LQRU
армировать/LQRU
ахнуть/BLMR
барабанить/LPTW
бацнуть/LMR
бичевать/LQTU
благоухать/BLMP
борировать/LQU
бочарничать/LMP
бряцать/BLMP
будить/BLPW
важничать/BLMP
вбежать/LRY
ввёртывать/BLMP
вдалбливаться/LD
вдвинуться/LMRT
величаться/LMP
верховодить/LPW
взбаламучивать/LMP
взбудоражить/LRTW
взвиваться/BLMP
вздрагивать/BLMP
вздыбиться/LRD
взмётывать/LMP
взрываться/LMP
взъерепениться/LRW
вкапываться/BLMP
вклинивать/BLMP
вкручивать/BLMP
вменяться/LPD
вмерзать/LMP
внюхаться/BLMR
возбранять/BLPU
возвышать/BLMP
возлегла/L
возмущаться/BLMP
волочься/LM
воображаться/LD
воскрешать/BLMP
воспоминать/LMP
восторгаться/BLMP
вперить/LRTW
вплывать/BLMP
вработаться/LMR
вразумить/BLRW
всасывать/BLMP
вскрикивать/BLMP
вскрывать/BLMP
вспороть/BLMR
вставляться/LD
встрёпывать/BLMP
втаптываться/LMP
втолковывать/BLMP
выбиваться/BLMP
выбрать/LR
выворачивать/BLMP
выгадывать/BLMP
выделать/LMR
выдерживать/BLMP
выедать/BLMP
вызнать/BLMR
вызывать/BLMP
выкликать/BLMP
выключаться/BLMP
выламывать/BLMP
выламываться/BLMP
выменять/BLRU
вымётывать/LMP
выпаривать/BLMP
выпачкаться/BLMR
выполоть/BLMR
выпроваживать/BLMP
вырастать/BLMP
вырисовывать/BLMP
высевать/BLMP
выскабливать/BLMP
выспрашивать/BLMP
выстраиваться/BLMP
вытащить/BLRW
вытолкнуть/BLMR
выхаркивать/LMP
вычерпнуть/BLMR
вышвыривать/BLMP
гаркнуть/BLMR
гарпунить/LPW
гноить/LPW
гримировать/LQTU
двигать/BLMP
двурушничать/BLMP
демонтироваться/L
дискредитироваться/LQTU
добросаться/LMR
довернуть/BLRU
дожаривать/BLMP
дожигать/LMP
докопаться/BLMR
докручивать/LMP
доноситься/LPD
допиливать/BLMP
дорастить/LRW
дорыть/BLMR
достриг/L
дотягиваться/BLMP
драпировать/LQTU
ехидствовать/LQTU
жалеть/BLMP
заарканить/LRTW
заболеть/BLMR
забомбить/LRW
завербовываться/BLMP
завешиваться/LMP
завопить/BLRW
завязывать/BLMP
загнуть/BLRU
загрубеть/LMR
загрязняться/LPU
задохнуться/BLMRU
задрыгать/LMR
зазеленеть/LR
зазывать/BLMP
закатываться/BLMP
закаяться/LMR
закомпостировать/LRTU
закоснеть/LMR
закупать/BLMP
заласкать/BLMR
заляпаться/LMR
замащивать/BLMP
замешкаться/BLMR
замяукать/LMR
занесла/L
запестреть/L
запечатлевать/LMP
заполонить/BLRW
запотевать/LMP
запрягаться/BLMP
запятнаться/LMR
зарифмовать/LRTU
засасывать/BLMP
засекретиться/LRW
засоряться/LPD
застёгиваться/BLMP
заступиться/BLRW
заталкивать/BLMP
затерять/BLRU
затренькать/LMR
затруднить/BLRW
захламливать/LMP
захлёбывать/BLMP
зачертыхаться/LMR
зачитывать/BLMP
зашпилить/LRTW
звякать/BLMP
злобствовать/LQTU
изведывать/BLMP
извивать/LMP
издержаться/LRU
измарать/LMR
измотаться/LMR
изречь/LM
изучаться/BLMP
импонировать/LQU
инъецировать/LQU
исписывать/BLMP
испытывать/BLMP
истолковать/LRTU
исцарапаться/BLMR
кадить/LPW
кашлянуть/BLMR
кидаться/BLMP
ковылять/BLPU
компостировать/LQTU
копнуть/BLRU
крестить/BLPW
кропать/LMP
курить/BLPW
лететь/LTY
лишаться/BLMP
лучить/LPW
материализоваться/LQ
махаться/BLMPY
млеть/BLMP
мудрить/BLPW
набегаться/LMR
наболтать/BLMR
навлекать/BLMP
навоевать/LRU
нагромоздиться/LRD
надвигать/BLMP
надпилить/BLRW
надумать/BLMR
нажить/LRV
накапать/BLMR
наклеить/LRTW
накрываться/BLMP
налакаться/BLMR
намешивать/LMP
намётывать/LMP
напиваться/BLMP
написать/BLMRTY
напряг/L
напугаться/BLMR
насаждаться/LPD
насиживать/LMP
настать/LRY
насылать/LMP
натискать/LMR
нахапать/BLMR
находить/BLPW
наэлектризовываться/LMP
неслась/L
нестись/M
оббивать/BLMP
обвивать/BLMP
обдаться/BLRY
обезгаживать/LMP
обеливать/LMP
обёртывать/BLMP
обзаводиться/BLPW
облагать/BLMP
облегчить/BLRW
облучаться/BLMP
обматываться/LMP
обмякнуть/MR
обносить/BLPW
обольщать/BLMP
обонять/LU
обрестись/L
обрусеть/LMR
обстреливаться/LMP
обсыпать/BLMPRV
обучаться/BLMP
общаться/BLMP
обязывать/BLMP
огораживать/BLMP
огрубеть/LMR
одурачивать/LMP
оживлять/BLPU
окаменеть/BLMR
окапывать/BLMP
окриветь/LMR
окружать/BLMP
омрачиться/LRW
опекать/BLMP
оплешиветь/LMR
опошливать/LMP
оправлять/LPU
опухать/BLMP
ораторствовать/LQTU
осиливать/LMP
оскабливать/BLMP
оснащать/BLMP
остерегаться/BLMP
оступиться/BLRW
отбирать/BLMP
отбуянить/LRW
отвинчивать/BLMP
отвориться/BLRD
отделывать/BLMP
отделяться/BLPU
откашливаться/BLMP
откланиваться/LMP
откровенничать/BLMP
откручиваться/LMP
отмазываться/BLMP
отмечать/BLMP
отобрать/LR
отпаивать/BLMP
отпилить/BLRW
отрабатывать/BLMP
отразиться/BLRW
отсвечиваться/LD
отсевать/LMP
отстраивать/LMP
отсуживать/LMP
оттолкнуть/BLRU
отфильтровывать/BLMP
отчеканить/LRTW
отъедать/LMP
отъять/LR
охрипнуть/BMR
оцеплять/BLPU
ощупываться/LMP
паковаться/L
пеленговать/LQTU
перебраниваться/BLMP
перевалить/BLRW
перевооружаться/BLMP
переворотить/LRW
перегруппировываться/LMP
передаваться/BLPU
перезабыть/LRY
перезанимать/LMR
перекашивать/LMP
перекинуться/LMRT
перекроить/BLRW
перекутывать/LMP
переманивать/BLMP
перемножать/BLMP
перенасыщать/LMP
перепаковывать/BLMP
перепаять/BLR
перепруживать/LMP
перерабатывать/BLMP
пересесть/LRY
пересматривать/BLMP
перестрелять/BLRU
перетаскивать/BLMP
переупаковывать/BLMP
перешивать/BLMP
перешла/L
плакаться/LY
плошать/BLMP
побеседовать/LRTU
побуждать/BLMP
повериться/LD
поворочать/BLMR
повторяться/BLPU
погорячиться/BLRW
погребать/LMP
подвернуть/BLRU
подвивать/LMP
поддаться/BLRY
поддерживаться/LMP
подкараулить/LRTW
подкашивать/LMP
подлежать/LU
подломать/BLMR
подозреваться/LMP
подписаться/LRTY
подразумевать/BLMP
подсмеиваться/BLMP
подстерегать/BLMP
подтирать/BLMP
подымать/BLMP
подыскивать/BLMP
поймать/BLMR
поквитаться/BLMR
покрыться/BLMR
полоскать/BLMY
помолодеть/BLMR
помять/LRY
понюхать/BLMR
поправляться/BLPU
попрекнуть/LMR
порождать/BLMP
посветлеть/LMR
посещать/BLMP
пострадать/BLMR
поступить/BLRW
потрескивать/LMP
пофорсить/BLRW
похлопать/BLMR
пошлёпать/BLMR
превратиться/BLRW
предпосылать/LMP
преобразить/BLRW
пресекать/BLMP
привирать/BLMP
привозить/BLPW
придавливать/BLMP
прикапливать/BLMP
прикапывать/BLMP
прикуривать/BLMP
приминаться/LPD
примыкать/BLMP
припарковываться/BLMP
приподниматься/BLMP
припутывать/LMP
пристреливать/BLMP
пристроиться/LRTW
притянуть/BLMR
прихрамывать/BLMP
причерчивать/LMP
проболтать/BLMR
проваляться/BLRU
прогадать/BLMR
прогуливаться/BLMP
продёргивать/BLMP
проигрывать/BLMP
производиться/BLPW
проколоться/BLM
пролиться/LR
промокнуть/BLMRU
пропесочивать/LMP
пропищать/LRU
прорезинивать/LMP
прослыть/LRY
просовывать/BLMP
протаптывать/BLMP
проточить/BLRW
прохлаждать/LMP
прыскать/LMP
пунцоветь/LMP
разбрасываться/BLMP
развеваться/LPD
развлекать/BLMP
разграничивать/BLMP
разгружать/BLMP
раздуваться/BLMP
разлучить/BLRW
размениваться/BLMP
разобщаться/LMP
разоружить/BLRW
разрываться/BLMP
рапортовать/LQTU
раскапывать/BLMP
расколдовывать/LMP
раскупорить/LRTW
раскутываться/LMP
расплескать/BLMRY
расправить/LRTW
распутываться/BLMP
расспросить/BLRW
рассредоточивать/LMP
растеривать/LMP
растрепаться/LV
расхвастаться/LMR
расшифровывать/BLMP
расшутиться/LR
рокироваться/LQU
рявкнуть/BLMR
сбраживать/BLMP
свататься/BLMP
сгибать/BLMP
сгноить/BLRW
сентиментальничать/BLMP
синтезировать/LQTU
скашивать/BLMP
скоситься/BLRW
скручиваться/LMP
случать/BLMP
слямзить/LRW
смолкнуть/BMR
сникать/LMP
снискивать/LMP
сойтись/M
сомлеть/LMR
сострадать/LM
сочувствовать/LQTU
спиваться/LMP
спугивать/BLMP
спускать/BLMP
ссыхаться/LMP
стимулировать/LQTU
стронуться/LMRT
сутулиться/LPTW
сцеживаться/BLMP
телефонизировать/LQU
тикать/BLMP
трахнуть/BLMR
трястись/M
убиваться/BLMP
уведомляться/LPU
увязываться/BLMP
удесятерять/LPU
ужаривать/BLMP
украсить/LRTW
укрывать/BLMP
уминать/BLMP
умыться/BLMR
упасти/M
уравновесить/LRTW
урезонивать/BLMP
устраивать/BLMP
устрашить/BLRW
утрамбовывать/BLMP
ухмыляться/BLPU
фрахтовать/LQTU
фривольничать/BLMP
хорошеть/BLMP
целоваться/LQTU
чикать/LMP
шваркать/BLMP
шелохнуться/BLRU
экспортировать/LQTU
